Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4707
Other remedies available at death.

(a) At the death of a community-property spouse, the surviving community-property spouse or a personal representative, heir, or nonprobate transferee of the decedent may assert a right based on an act of:

(1) the surviving community-property spouse or decedent during the marriage or other relationship under which community property then could be acquired; or

(2) the decedent that takes effect at the death of the decedent.

(b) In determining a right under subsection (a) of this section and corresponding remedy, the court:

(1) shall apply equitable principles; and

(2) may consider the community property law of the jurisdiction where the decedent or surviving community-property spouse was domiciled when property was acquired or enhanced.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 7.